Maine, session 132, LD839.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3209-F is enacted to read:
§3209-F. Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund
1. Fund established. There is established the Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization
Fund, referred to in this section as "the fund," as an account within the commission. The
fund is a nonlapsing, revolving fund administered by the commission for the purpose of
offsetting the costs to ratepayers associated with the net energy billing program under
section 3209-A and section 3209-B.
2. Sources for fund. The commission may receive and deposit in the fund funds from
the following sources:
A. Federal funds and awards that may be used for the purposes specified in this section;
B. Appropriations and transfers authorized by the Legislature; and
C. Any other funds from public or private sources received for the purposes of this
section.
3. Use of funds. To the extent that funds are available, the commission shall use the
fund exclusively to make payments to reimburse transmission and distribution utilities for
any costs incurred as a result of the net energy billing program under section 3209-A and
section 3209-B that would have otherwise been paid by ratepayers.
4. Rules. The commission may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2‑A.
5. Report. By February 1st of any year in which the commission has paid a
reimbursement from the fund to a transmission and distribution utility in the prior calendar
year, the commission shall provide a report to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over electricity matters that includes the amount of the
reimbursement paid in the prior calendar year, the source of any funds received by the fund
Page 1 - 132LR0706(04)

in the prior calendar year and any other relevant information as determined by the
commission. The committee may report out a bill related to the commission's report.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION
Net Energy Billing Cost Stabilization Fund N540
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the purpose of making payments to transmission
and distribution utilities that would have otherwise been paid by ratepayers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $500 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $500 $0
Page 2 - 132LR0706(04)